Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB407.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8901 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 8901. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Annual income." All income received by an applicant and the applicant's spouse while residing in the residence during the calendar year prior to the year for which the exemption is claimed.* * *"Income." As follows:123456789101112131415161718 (1) All income from whatever source derived, including any of the following:(i) Salaries, wages, bonuses, commissions, income from self-employment, alimony, support money, cash public assistance and relief.(ii) The gross amount of any pensions or annuities, including 50% of railroad retirement benefits.(iii) Fifty percent of all benefits received under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 (relating to Social Security), except Medicare benefits.(iv) All benefits received under State unemployment insurance laws and veterans' disability payments.(v) All interest received from the Federal Government or a state government or an instrumentality or political subdivision of the Federal Government or a state government.(vi) Realized capital gains and rentals.(vii) Workers' compensation.(viii) The gross amount of loss of time insurance benefits, life insurance benefits and proceeds, except for the first $5,000 of the total of death benefit payments.(ix) Gifts of cash or property, other than transfers by gift between members of a household, in excess of a total value of $300.(2) The term does not include surplus food or other relief in kind supplied by a governmental agency, property tax or rent rebate or inflation dividend.* * *Section 2. Section 8904(1) and (2) of Title 51 are amended 20250SB0407PN0362 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to read:§ 8904. Duty of commission.The commission shall:(1) Fix uniform and equitable standards for determining the need for exemption from the payment of real estate taxes granted by this act. In fixing such uniform and equitable standards, [the commission shall apply a rebuttable presumption that] an applicant with annual income of $75,000 or less [has a need for] shall be deemed to be in need of the exemption. Beginning on January 1, 2009, and every two years thereafter, the commission shall [adjust] increase the annual income level qualifying for the [rebuttable presumption of need] exemption for need by an amount equal to the [change] average of any increase in the Consumer Price Index in the preceding two years. The commission shall [publish] transmit the adjusted annual income level qualifying for the [rebuttable presumption of] exemption for need to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication as a notice in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) [After] For applicants with an annual income that exceeds $75,000, after submission of proof of need by the applicant for the exemption from payment of real estate taxes, determine the need of the applicant.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0407PN0362 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425